Utah statutes.
62A-4a-120.   Accommodation of moral and religious beliefs and culture.

(1)  The division shall adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and establish procedures to accommodate the moral and religious beliefs, and culture, of the minors and families it serves, including:

(a)  the immediate family and other relatives of a minor in any type of custody or otherwise under the jurisdiction of the court;

(b)  foster and other out-of-home placement families; and

(c)  adoptive families.

(2)  The accommodation under Subsection (1) applies to placements, treatment plans, services, and other activities of the division.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

